District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.25

Licensees to maintain office and keep records; contents, inspection and confidentiality of records; violations.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 412, ch. 93, title 9, § 25
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 462, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(u), 38 DCR 314
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(q), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 28(c), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1425.
1973 Ed., § 35-1125.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2602.01.